Mississippi statutes. Title 71. Labor and Industry
Article 3. Mississippi Department of Employment Security.
§ 71-5-143.
State-federal cooperation [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

In the administration of this chapter, the department shall cooperate, to the fullest extent consistent with the provisions of this chapter, with the Social Security Board created by the Social Security Act, approved August 14, 1935, as amended; shall make such reports in such form and containing such information as the Social Security Board may from time to time require, and shall comply with such provisions as the Social Security Board may from time to time find necessary to assure the correctness and verification of such reports; and shall comply with the reasonable, valid and lawful regulations prescribed by the Social Security Board pursuant to and under the authority of the Social Security Act, governing the expenditures of such sums as may be allotted and paid to this state under Title III of the Social Security Act, as amended, for the purpose of assisting in the administration of this chapter.

Upon request therefor, the department shall furnish to any agency of the United States charged with the administration of public works, or assistance through public employment, the name, address, ordinary occupation and employment status of each recipient of benefits, and such recipient’s rights to further benefits under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7418; Laws, 1940, ch. 295, § 9; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 6m; Laws, 1952, ch. 383, § 4m; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 6m; Laws, 1962, ch. 564, § 3m; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 32; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 32; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 31; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 32; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 32, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 32, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 71-5-145.
1235 Echelon Parkway named the Henry J. Kirksey Building.

The building located at 1235 Echelon Parkway in Jackson, Mississippi, and in which the Mississippi Department of Employment Security is housed, shall be named the Henry J. Kirksey Building. The Department of Finance and Administration shall prepare a distinctive plaque, to be placed in a prominent place within the Henry J. Kirksey Building, which states the background, accomplishments and service to the state of the Honorable Henry J. Kirksey.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 339, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 14, 2007.).